Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-8,107
Teachers; lunch period; exception.

Every school district shall provide each teacher with an uninterrupted lunch period of not less than thirty minutes each school day, and no teacher shall be assigned teaching, supervisory, or other duties during such lunch period, except that school district attendance centers having less than two teachers shall be exempted from the provisions of this section.

Laws 1967, c. 519, § 1, p. 1741;

R.S.1943, (1981), § 79-547;

Laws 1986, LB 820, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-1254.10;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 532.